Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of labor and industry to make competitive grants to provide code enforcement officials in municipalities with a population of at least 50,000 with support, education, training, and tools related to compliance and technology compatibility to streamline the State Energy Code compliance process, particularly for performance-based energy code standards. Of this amount, five percent is for grant administration. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. By December 31, 2028, the commissioner must report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over the State Energy Code on the expenditures and outcomes of these grants. new text end